DTC P0134 [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)]


id0102f1804900

DTC P0134

A/F sensor no activity detected

DETECTION CONDITION
•  The PCM monitors the input voltage from A/F sensor when the following conditions are met. If the input voltage from the sensor never exceeds 0.1 V for specified period, the PCM determines that sensor circuit is not activated.
MONITORING CONDITIONS
―  Following conditions are met
•  Engine is running.
•  Battery voltage is 11—16 V.
Diagnostic support note
•  FREEZE FRAME DATA is available.
•  DTC is stored in the PCM memory.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  A/F sensor deterioration
•  A/F sensor heater malfunction
•  Leakage exhaust system
•  Open circuit or short to ground in wiring harness between A/F sensor terminal A and PCM terminal 93
•  Insufficient compression
•  Engine malfunction

Diagnostic procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

ACTION

1
VERIFY FREEZE FRAME DATA HAS BEEN RECORDED
•  Has FREEZE FRAME DATA been recorded?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Record the FREEZE FRAME DATA on the repair order, then go to the next step.
2
VERIFY RELATED REPAIR INFORMATION AVAILABILITY
•  Verify related service repair information availability.
•  Is any related repair information available?
Yes
Perform repair or diagnosis according to the available repair information.
•  If the vehicle is not repaired, go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
3
VERIFY RELATED PENDING AND STORED DTC
Note
•  If fuel monitor DTC, DTC P0132 is retrieved, ignore it until P0134 is fixed.
•  Turn the engine switch off, then to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Verify pending and stored DTCs using the M-MDS.
•  Are other DTCs present?
Yes
Go to the appropriate DTC troubleshooting procedures.
No
Go to the next step.
4
IDENTIFY TRIGGER DTC FOR FREEZE FRAME DATA
•  Is DTC P0134 on FREEZE FRAME DATA?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Go to troubleshooting procedures for DTC on FREEZE FRAME DATA.
5
VERIFY CURRENT INPUT SIGNAL STATUS
•  Warm up engine.
•  Access O2S11 PID using the M-MDS.
•  Verify PID while racing engine in PARK or NEUTRAL.
•  Is PID normal?
―  Less than 1 mA when suddenly depressing accelerator pedal (rich condition)
―  More than 1 mA just after releasing the accelerator pedal (lean condition)
Yes
Go to step 10.
No
Go to the next step.
6
INSPECT INSTALLATION OF A/F SENSOR
•  Inspect if the A/F sensor is loosely installed.
•  Is the sensor installed securely?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Install sensor securely, then go to Step 12.
7
INSPECT GAS LEAKAGE FROM EXHAUST SYSTEM
•  Visually inspect if there is any gas leakage between the exhaust manifold and A/F sensor.
•  Is there gas leakage?
Yes
Repair or replace any malfunctioning exhaust part, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
8
INSPECT A/F SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR OPEN CIRCUIT
•  Inspect for continuity between the A/F sensor terminal A (wiring harness-side) to the PCM terminal 93 (wiring harness-side).
•  Is there continuity?
Yes
Go to the next step
No
Repair or replace the wiring harness for a possible open circuit, then go to Step 12.
9
INSPECT A/F SENSOR SIGNAL CIRCUIT FOR SHORT TO GROUND
•  Inspect for continuity between the A/F sensor terminal A (wiring harness-side) to body ground.
•  Is there continuity?
Yes
Repair or replace the wiring harness for a possible short to ground, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
10
INSPECT SEALING OF ENGINE COOLANT PASSAGE
•  Perform the ENGINE COOLANT LEAKAGE INSPECTION. (See ENGINE COOLANT LEAKAGE INSPECTION [MZR-CD (RF Turbo)].)
•  Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the malfunctioning part according to inspection results, then go to Step 12.
No
Go to the next step.
11
INSPECT ENGINE COMPRESSION
•  Inspect the engine compression.
•  Is it normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Perform engine overhaul for repairs, then go to the next step.
12
VERIFY TROUBLESHOOTING OF DTC P0134 COMPLETED
•  Make sure to reconnect all disconnected connectors.
•  Turn the engine switch to the ON position (Engine off).
•  Clear the DTC from memory using the M-MDS.
•  Perform the Repair Verification Drive Mode.
•  Is the PENDING CODE for this DTC present?
Yes
Replace the PCM, then go to the next step.
No
Go to the next step.
13
VERIFY AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE
•  Perform the “After Repair Procedure”.
•  Are any DTC present?
Yes
Go to the applicable DTC troubleshooting.
No
Troubleshooting completed.